Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 14.1 Minority Business Enterprise

37-14.1-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to carry out the state’s policy of supporting the fullest possible participation of firms owned and controlled by minorities and women (MBE’s) in state funded and state directed public construction programs and projects and in state purchases of goods and services. This includes assisting MBE’s throughout the life of contracts in which they participate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 493, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 523, § 1.

37-14.1-2.
Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to any and all state purchasing, including, but not limited to, the procurement of goods, services, construction projects, or contracts funded in whole or in part by state funds, or funds which, in accordance with a federal grant or otherwise, the state expends or administers or in which the state is a signatory to the construction contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 493, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 523, § 1.

37-14.1-3.
Definitions.

“Affirmative action” means taking specific steps to eliminate discrimination and its effects, to ensure nondiscriminatory results and practices in the future, and to involve minority business enterprises fully in contracts and programs funded by the state.

“Compliance” means the condition existing when a contractor has met and implemented the requirements of this chapter.

“Contract” means a mutually binding legal relationship or any modification thereof obligating the seller to furnish supplies or services, including construction, and the buyer to pay for them. For purposes of this chapter, a lease is a contract.

“Contractor” means one who participates, through a contract or subcontract, in any procurement or program covered by this chapter and includes lessees and material suppliers.

“Minority” means a person who is a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States and who is:

Black (a person having origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa);

Hispanic (a person of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, Central or South American, or other Spanish culture or origin, regardless of race);

Portuguese (a person of Portuguese, Brazilian, or other Portuguese culture or origin, regardless of race);

Asian American (a person having origins in any of the original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands);

American Indian and Alaskan Native (a person having origins in any of the original peoples of North America); or

Members of other groups or other individuals found to be economically and socially disadvantaged by the Small Business Administration under § 8(a) of the Small Business Act, as amended, 15 U.S.C. § 637(a).

“Minority business enterprise” or “MBE” means a small business concern, as defined pursuant to § 3 of the federal Small Business Act, 15 U.S.C. § 632, and implementing regulations, which is owned and controlled by one or more minorities or women. For the purposes of this chapter, owned and controlled means a business:

Which is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned by one or more minorities or women or, in the case of a publicly owned business, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the stock of which is owned by one or more minorities or women; and

Whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more such individuals.

“MBE coordinator” means the official designated to have overall responsibility for promotion of minority business enterprise in his or her departmental element.

“Noncompliance” means the condition existing when a recipient or contractor has failed to implement the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 493, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 523, § 1.

37-14.1-4.
Policy.

It is the policy of the state of Rhode Island that minority business enterprises (MBE’s) shall have the maximum opportunity to participate in the performance of procurements and projects outlined in §

37-14.1-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 493, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 523, § 1.

37-14.1-5.
Discrimination prohibited.

No person shall be excluded from participation in, denied the benefits of, or otherwise discriminated against in connection with the award and performance of any project covered by this chapter on the grounds of race, color, national origin, or sex.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 493, § 1.

37-14.1-6.
Minority business enterprise participation.

Minority business enterprises shall be included in all procurements and construction projects under this chapter and shall be awarded a minimum of ten percent (10%) of the dollar value of the entire procurement or project. The director of the department of administration is further authorized to establish by rules and regulation the certification process and formulas for giving minority business enterprises a preference in contract and subcontract awards.

Any minority business enterprise currently certified by the U.S. Small Business Administration as an 8(a) firm governed by 13 C.F.R. part 124 shall be deemed to be certified by the department of administration as a minority business enterprise and shall only be required to submit evidence of federal certification of good standing.

The provisions of chapter 14.1 of title 37 shall not be waived, including, but not limited to, during a declared state of emergency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 493, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 523, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 336, § 1, effective July 15, 2021.

37-14.1-7.
Establishment of criteria and guidelines.

The director of the department of administration shall establish, by rule and regulations adopted in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42, standards which shall determine whether a construction project is covered by this chapter, compliance formulas, procedures for implementation, and procedures for enforcement which are not inconsistent with 49 CFR 23 of the federal regulations. As to Rhode Island department of transportation contracts, the director of administration may delegate this authority to the director of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 493, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 550, § 1.

37-14.1-8.
Sanctions.

The director of the department of administration shall have the power to impose sanctions upon contractors not in compliance with this chapter and shall include but not be limited to:

Suspension of payments;

Termination of the contract;

Recovery by the state of ten percent (10%) of the contract award price as liquidated damages; and

Denial of right to participate in future projects for up to three (3) years.

As to Rhode Island department of transportation contracts, the director of the department of administration may delegate this authority to the director of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 493, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 551, § 1.